Louisiana, session 2026, HB1005.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.16 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2800.16. Limitation of liability; Louisiana Public Defender Oversight Board
members
No individual member of the Louisiana Public Defender Oversight Board
member shall be is personally liable for any act or omission resulting in damage,
injury, or loss arising out of the exercise of his official functions and duties.
However, this This limitation of liability shall not be applicable does not apply if the
gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of a member is the cause of the
damage, injury, or loss was caused by the gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct of a member.
Section 2. R.S. 11:1902(introductory paragraph) and (12)(c) and 1903(A)(2) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1902. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings, unless a different meaning is plainly required by context:
* * *
(12)
* * *
(c) "Employee" shall also mean means a person employed by a district
indigent public defender program in this state, without regard to the source of funds
for such districts or programs, provided the employee works at least twenty-eight
hours a week and the program is an employer as defined in this Section. No person
employed by an indigent office of a district public defender program shall be is
entitled to receive credit for service rendered prior to becoming eligible for
membership in the system.
* * *
Page 2 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
§1903. Admission of certain entities as employers
A. The following entities may submit, for approval by the board of trustees,
a plan for extending the benefits of this Chapter to employees of the entity:
* * *
(2) A district indigent public defender program office in this state.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 13:996.43(C), 1381.5(B)(2)(d), 2081.3, and 5951(E)(1)(b) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§996.43. Judicial expense fund for Fifth Judicial District
* * *
C. The judges, en banc, may appoint such law clerks and secretarial, clerical,
research, administrative, and other personnel as they deem necessary to expedite the
business and function of the court and fix and pay all or any part of the salaries of
such personnel out of the monies in the judicial expense fund. In like a similar
manner, the judges, en banc, may utilize the monies in the judicial expense fund to
pay all or any part of the cost of establishing or maintaining a law library for the
court, to support the Indigent Defender Board office of the district public defender,
or for buying or maintaining any type of equipment, supplies, or other items
consistent with or germane to the efficient operation of the court. In general, the
judicial expense fund is established and may be used for any purpose or purposes
connected with, incidental to, or related to the proper administration or function of
the court, or the offices of the individual judges, and is in addition to any and all
other funds, salaries, expenses, or other monies that are provided, authorized, or
established by law for any of these purposes.
* * *
§1381.5. The Orleans Parish administration of criminal justice fund
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(2) Each quarterly distribution shall be calculated and allocated as follows:
* * *
(d) Twenty percent of all funds received to the Orleans Parish indigent
defender's program office of the district public defender.
* * *
§2081.3. Monroe; transfer of funds
The City Court of Monroe may transfer unused or surplus funds from the
money collected and deposited into the account for the pretrial diversion program
into the general operational account of the court to be used for the operational
expenses of the court. The expenditure of these funds shall be at the sole discretion
of the judges of the court except that a portion of that amount, not to exceed twenty
percent, shall be used to fund the indigent defender program office of the district
public defender. Any funds so transferred shall be included in the court's annual
audit.
* * *
§5951. Orleans Parish Juvenile Services Financing District
* * *
E. Appropriation of funds. (1) The district may fund any of the following:
* * *
(b) Supplemental funding for the Orleans Parish indigent defender program's
juvenile division within the office of the district public defender in Orleans Parish
to provide for up to six full-time public defenders, assigned on the basis of one per
section of court, and six full-time paralegals, assigned on the basis of one paired with
each public defender.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 15:146, 148(B)(introductory paragraph) and (1)(c), 161(Section
heading) and (E)(introductory paragraph) and (12), 162(D), 165(B)(1)(b) and (2) and (E),
169(B), 174(C), 176(C)(1), 185.2(introductory paragraph), (5), (7), and (8), 185.3(A)(2) and
(B)(introductory paragraph), (11), (14)(b)(introductory paragraph) and (iii), and
(19)(introductory paragraph) and (g), 185.4(A) and (B)(introductory paragraph), (2)(b), (8),
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
and (10), 186.2(6), 186.3(A)(2), (B)(introductory paragraph), (10), (13)(introductory
paragraph) and (c), and (18)(introductory paragraph) and (c), 186.4(A), 186.6,
571.11(L)(introductory paragraph), (1)(a)(iv), (b)(iv), and (c)(iv), and (3)(d) and (M)(3),
1202(A)(14), and 1442(C)(introductory paragraph) and (7) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 15:145 and 161(J) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§145. Office of the state public defender
A. The office of the state public defender is created as a state agency within
the office of the governor to provide for the supervision, administration, and delivery
of a statewide public defender system, which shall deliver uniform public defender
services in all courts in this state.
B. The governor shall appoint the state public defender, subject to Senate
confirmation, for a term of two years.
§146. Office of the state public defender Louisiana Public Defender Oversight
Board
A.(1) There is hereby created and established as a state agency within the
office of the governor the office of the state public defender to provide for the
supervision, administration, and delivery of a statewide public defender system,
which shall deliver uniform public defender services in all courts in this state.
(2) The state public defender shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
approval of a majority of the board and Senate confirmation, for a term of two years.
B.A.(1) The Louisiana Public Defender Oversight Board is hereby created
and established to provide supervision and oversight to the office of the state public
defender and to approve contracts in an amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
or more. The board shall consist of nine members.
(2) Persons appointed to the board shall have been admitted to the practice
of law in this state for at least eight years or have been a judge in this state.
(3) The members shall be selected as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint four members and shall designate the
chairman.
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(b) The governor shall appoint one member from a list of three nominees
submitted to the governor by a joint resolution of the Public Defenders Association
of Louisiana and the Louisiana Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers.
(c) The Supreme Court of Louisiana Supreme Court shall by majority vote
appoint two members. One member shall be a juvenile justice advocate, and one
member shall be a retired judge.
(d) The president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of
Representatives shall each appoint one member.
(4) All appointments to the board shall be subject to confirmation by the
Senate.
(5) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
(6) Members of the board shall serve terms concurrent with that of the
governor.
C.B. The board shall notify the appropriate appointing authority of any board
vacancy which that occurs for any reason.
* * *
§148. Rulemaking; considerations in developing rules
* * *
B. The rules shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Creating mandatory statewide public defender standards and guidelines
that require public defender services to be provided in a manner that is uniformly fair
and consistent throughout the state. Those standards and guidelines shall take into
consideration all of the following:
* * *
(c) Documentation of communication. The office shall adopt standards and
guidelines to ensure that defense attorneys providing public defender services
provide documentation of communications with clients regarding the frequency of
attorney-client communications as required by rules adopted by the board office.
* * *
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
§161. District public defender; powers; duties; accounting; audit reporting; existing
district public defenders continued; establishment of office of the district
public defender
* * *
E. Each district public defender shall do all of the following:
* * *
(12) Make recommendations regarding the method of delivery of public
defender services for the district for submission to the board office for board office
approval. The board office shall consider any delivery model in existence prior to
August 15, 2007, as acceptable until that delivery model is proven to not meet the
uniform standards and guidelines for the delivery of public defender services in
accordance with applicable rules adopted by the board office and as required by
statute.
* * *
J. For the purposes of this Part, a district public defender who contracts with
the office of the state public defender for the delivery of legal services is an
independent contractor and is not an employee of the office.
§162. Vacancies in position of district public defender; formation of district public
defender selection committee; powers and duties of committee; process for
filling vacancy for district public defender; interim district public defender
* * *
D. Within thirty days of receiving the nominations for the position of district
public defender from the selection committee, the office shall contract with a district
public defender from the list of nominees submitted to the board state public
defender.
* * *
§165. Methods of delivery of public defender services; selection of methods;
emergency circumstances
* * *
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
B. The office shall approve the method of delivery of public defender
services for each district from the following service delivery methods or any
combination thereof:
(1)
* * *
(b) All appointments shall be on a successive, rotational basis by case-type
certification. Deviations from the board's list shall be permitted only to comply with
Code of Criminal Procedure Article 512 and in exceptional circumstances upon
approval of the office upon recommendation of the district public defender.
(2) An independent public defender organization qualified with the United
States Internal Revenue Service for an exemption from federal income tax under
Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide counsel for indigent
defendants. The office shall fix the compensation of the district public defender and
all assistants and supporting personnel shall be fixed by the board in compliance with
compensation standards adopted pursuant to rule by the board office.
* * *
E. An independent public defender organization qualified with the United
States Internal Revenue Service for an exemption from federal income tax under
Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code existing as of August 15, 2007, may,
do all of the following with the approval of current local indigent defender boards
of other judicial districts in its region, provide the office of the state public defender:
(1) Provide administration, management, and supervision of services and
budgets for those districts in each judicial district within its purview, with due
consideration for local variances from judicial district to judicial district within the
region, and establish, where.
(2) Establish, where necessary, satellite offices or part-time satellite offices
to maintain easy access to clients in each judicial district within their its purview.
* * *
§169. Representation of capital defendants
* * *
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
B. Staff counsel, or other counsel, who represented convicted capital
defendants in state court proceedings may, if authorized by the office, accept
appointments from a federal court to represent those defendants, but only if
authorized by the office and if compensation is provided by funds as directed by the
appointing federal court. Such funds shall remain Funds obtained pursuant to this
Subsection are subject to the use of the board office and may be used for paying the
costs of such representation. No state-appropriated funds shall be expended for the
representation of capital defendants in federal court.
* * *
§174. Special reporting requirements; penalties
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section, a "case" is defined as a charge or set of
charges contained in a charging instrument or petition against a single accused
arising out of one or more events, transactions, or occurrences, which are joined, or
which may be joined pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 490 through
495.1. Cases that involve multiple persons accused are counted as a separate case
for each person accused. Cases that involve multiple charges or counts are recorded
with the highest charge, based on the severity of sentence for the crime charged, as
the case type. Multiple charges against a single person for the issuing of worthless
checks shall be counted as a single case. Each appeal, after conviction, shall be
counted as a separate case. In the event that If a charging instrument contains a
charge or set of charges arising out of multiple events, transactions, or occurrences,
indigent defender boards each office of the district public defender shall track,
record, and report the number of such instances per charging instrument.
* * *
§176. Partial reimbursement by indigents
* * *
C.(1) When an accused is initially determined to be indigent and appointed
counsel but subsequently hires private counsel, the court shall conduct a
contradictory hearing to determine the expenses of representing the accused incurred
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
by the office of the district public defender or the service region for representation
of the accused, where applicable. Upon determining the expenses incurred, the
accused shall, within the discretion of the court, be liable to reimburse the office of
the district public defender or service region, where applicable, those expenses, upon
a determination that the accused was in fact not initially indigent. The accused,
within the discretion of the court and where applicable, is liable to reimburse the
office of the district public defender or service region for the incurred expenses after
a determination from the court that expenses were incurred and the accused was not
initially indigent. A judgment for the amount owed may be recorded in the mortgage
records in favor of the board office of the district public defender for the payment of
money against the accused and may be enforced as provided by law.
* * *
§185.2. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following words shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(5) "Indigent Parents' Program" or "the program" means the Indigent Parents'
Representation Program required by the Louisiana Children's Code and administered
in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:185.1 through 185.9 185.8.
* * *
(7) "Office" means the office of the state public defender as created by R.S.
15:146.
(8) "Public defender" or "indigent defender" means an attorney employed by
or under contract with the office of the district public defender or a nonprofit
organization contracting with the board office or the district public defender to
provide representation, including curatorship appointments, to indigent or absent
parents in child abuse and neglect cases as required by the provisions of the
Children's Code.
* * *
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
§185.3. Indigent Parents' Representation Program; duties of the office; subject to
appropriation
A.
* * *
(2) Except for the inherent regulatory authority of the Louisiana Supreme
Court provided for in Article V, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana regarding
the regulation of the practice of law, the board and the office shall have has all
regulatory authority, control, supervision, and jurisdiction, including auditing and
enforcement, and all power incidental or necessary thereto to administer a program
to provide for the delivery of indigent or absent parent representation throughout the
courts of the this state of Louisiana.
B. In the administration of the Indigent Parents' Representation Program, the
office shall do all of the following:
* * *
(11) Provide for the employing or contracting with and training of attorneys
and other professional and nonprofessional staff that may be necessary to carry out
the functions of the program. All attorneys representing indigent or absent parents
through this program shall be licensed to practice law in Louisiana this state and
qualified in accordance with standards and guidelines adopted by rule of the board
office.
* * *
(14)
* * *
(b) The plan of organization shall provide for the capacity to do all of the
following:
* * *
(iii) Provide for enforcement of board office rules as is necessary for the
efficient and thorough regulation and governance of representation of indigent or
absent parent services under its jurisdiction.
* * *
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(19) Assign appropriate staff to do all of the following:
* * *
(g) Assist the district public defenders in the compliance with standards and
guidelines adopted by the board office pursuant to this Section. The office staff shall
assist the district public defenders with implementation of standards, and guidelines,
and supervision policy and procedures to verify compliance.
* * *
§185.4. Standards and guidelines for representation of indigent parents; rulemaking
A. The board office shall adopt all rules necessary to implement the
provisions of this Part.
B. The rules shall include but not be limited to the following:
* * *
(2) Ensuring the standards and guidelines shall take into consideration all of
the following:
* * *
(b) Continuity of representation. The board office shall adopt standards and
guidelines which that ensure that each district devises a plan to provide that to the
extent feasible and practicable the same attorney handles a case from appointment
contact through completion in all cases.
* * *
(8) Establishing a policy of selecting a proportionate number of minority and
women attorneys in accordance with the makeup of the general population of the
state, to the extent that minority and women attorneys are available and otherwise
eligible for selection within each district in accordance with law. Any citizen of
majority age shall have a cause of action to enjoin the activities of the board office
for failure to comply with this provision.
* * *
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(10) Establishing policies and procedures for handling conflict of interest
cases and overflow cases when workload standards which that are established by
rules of the board office are breached.
* * *
§186.2. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
* * *
(6) "Office" means the office of the state public defender as created by R.S.
15:146.
* * *
§186.3. Safe Return Representation Program; duties of the office; subject to
appropriation
A.
* * *
(2) Except for the regulatory authority of the Louisiana Supreme Court
provided for in Article V, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, the board and
the office shall have has all regulatory authority, control, supervision, and
jurisdiction, including auditing and enforcement, and all power necessary to
administer the program throughout the state.
B. In the administration of the Safe Return Program, the office shall do all
of the following:
* * *
(10) Train attorneys and other staff as may be necessary to carry out the
functions of the program. All attorneys representing indigent children through this
program shall be licensed to practice law in Louisiana this state and qualified in
accordance with the standards and guidelines adopted by rule of the board office.
* * *
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(13) Establish and modify a plan of organization to conduct the business of
regulating and controlling the delivery of program services. The plan of organization
shall provide for all of the following:
* * *
(c) The enforcement of board office rules.
* * *
(18) Assign appropriate staff to do all of the following:
* * *
(c) Assist district public defenders in maintaining compliance with standards
and guidelines adopted by the board office pursuant to this Section. The board office
staff shall assist the district public defenders with implementation of standards,
guidelines, supervision, policy, and procedures to maintain compliance.
* * *
§186.4. Standards and guidelines for representation of indigent children in custody;
rulemaking
A. The board office shall adopt all rules necessary to implement the
provisions of this Part.
* * *
§186.6. Implementation of Safe Return Representation Fund
A. Subject to appropriation, or the availability of other monies to the
program, the board office shall develop a program to establish a flexible delivery
system that is responsive to jurisdictional variances and local community needs. The
board may implement the program incrementally, but full statewide implementation
shall be completed not later than July 1, 2017.
B. The board office shall choose a method of implementation of the Safe
Return Representation Program that is efficient, feasible, practicable, and appropriate
to provide the best delivery of indigent parent representation.
* * *
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
§571.11. Dispositions of fines and forfeitures
* * *
L. All judgments of bond forfeiture rendered after August 1, 2016, resulting
that result from the posting of a bond in a criminal proceeding in the this state of
Louisiana upon collection by the prosecuting attorney for the jurisdiction in which
the bond was posted shall, upon collection by the prosecuting attorney for the
jurisdiction where the bond was posted, be paid to the prosecuting attorney. who
shall, The prosecuting attorney, as the attorney of record in the proceeding, shall
distribute the funds as follows:
(1) District courts. (a) In all judicial district courts of the state of Louisiana,
except in the parishes of Orleans, Iberia, and St. Martin, where the district attorney
collects on a judgment of bond forfeiture, the proceeds shall be distributed as
follows:
* * *
(iv) Twenty percent of all funds collected by the district attorney shall be
paid to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the district public defender for the
parish where the bond was posted.
(b) In the district court for the parish of St. Martin, where the district
attorney collects on a judgment of bond forfeiture, the proceeds shall be distributed
as follows:
* * *
(iv) Eighteen percent of all funds collected by the district attorney shall be
paid to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the district public defender for the
parish where the bond was posted.
* * *
(c) In the district court for the parish of Iberia, where the district attorney
collects on a judgment of bond forfeiture, the proceeds shall be distributed as
follows:
* * *
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(iv) Eighteen percent of all funds collected by the district attorney shall be
paid to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the district public defender for the
parish where the bond was posted.
* * *
(3) City and municipal courts. In all city and municipal courts throughout
the this state of Louisiana, except in municipal and traffic courts in the city of New
Orleans, where the prosecuting attorney collects on a judgment of bond forfeiture,
the proceeds shall be distributed as follows:
* * *
(d) Twenty-five percent of all funds collected by the prosecuting attorney
shall be paid to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the district public defender
of the court where the judgment was rendered. In the event the political subdivision
does not have an Indigent Defenders Program, the funds shall be paid to the Indigent
Defenders Program of the parish in which the bond was posted.
* * *
M. In all cases where the attorney general collects on judgments of bond
forfeiture, fifty percent of the funds collected shall be turned over to the attorney
general for deposit in his operating account, and the remaining fifty percent of the
funds collected shall be distributed as follows:
* * *
(3) Thirty percent of all funds collected by the attorney general shall be paid
to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the district public defender for the parish
where the bond was posted.
* * *
§1202. Composition of commission
A. The commission shall consist of fifty-nine members as follows:
* * *
(14) The state public defender employed by the Louisiana Public Defender
Board.
* * *
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
§1442. Louisiana Juvenile Jurisdiction Planning Implementation Committee;
composition; authority; responsibilities
* * *
C. The committee shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(7) An attorney One representative appointed by the Louisiana Public
Defender Board state public defender that is an expert in juvenile defense.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 22:822(B)(1)(d) and (2)(introductory paragraph) and (d) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§822. Criminal bail bond annual license fee
* * *
B.(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, all premium fees
collected by the sheriff shall be remitted within sixty days after receipt as follows:
* * *
(d) Twenty-five percent to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the
district public defender.
(2) In the Twenty-Second Judicial District, the sheriff shall remit all
collected premium fees collected by the sheriff shall be remitted within sixty days
after of receipt as follows:
* * *
(d) Twenty-two percent to the Indigent Defenders Program office of the
district public defender.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 36:4(B)(introductory paragraph) and (21) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§4. Structure of executive branch of state government
* * *
B. The office of the governor shall be is in the executive branch of state
government. The governor may allocate within his office the powers, duties, funds,
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
functions, appropriations, responsibilities, and personnel of the agencies within his
office and provide for the administration thereof and for the organization of his
office. The following agencies and their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities are hereby transferred to the office of the governor:
* * *
(21) The Louisiana Public Defender Oversight Board office of the state
public defender (R.S. 15:141 et seq.) shall be is placed within the office of the
governor as an independent agency and shall exercise its powers, duties, functions,
and responsibilities in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 36:801.1.
* * *
Section 7. R.S. 42:1121(I) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1121. Assistance to certain persons after termination of public service
* * *
I. The provisions of this Section shall do not prohibit a former chief indigent
defender as provided in R.S. 15:161(H), or a legal entity in which the former chief
indigent defender owns an interest, from donating office space, leasing office space
at a fair market value, or selling office space at fair market value following an
appraisal to the office of the district public defender defender's office if the
transaction is deemed necessary for the continuity of the provision of public defender
services within a judicial district at the same location and the transaction is approved
by the Louisiana Public Defender Board office of the state public defender or its
successor.
* * *
Section 8. R.S. 46:2168(B)(1) and 2605.4(C)(1)(h) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2168. Human Trafficking Prevention Commission Advisory Board
* * *
B. The advisory board shall be composed of the following members
appointed by the governor:
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
(1) A public defender nominated by the Louisiana Public Defender Board
state public defender or its his designee.
* * *
§2605.4. Council on the Children of Incarcerated Parents
* * *
C.(1) The CIP Council shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(h) One representative of the Louisiana Public Defender Board appointed by
the state public defender or the representative's designee.
* * *
Section 9. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 895.1(B)(introductory paragraph)
and (1) and 953 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 895.1. Probation; restitution; judgment for restitution; fees
* * *
B. When a court suspends the imposition or the execution of a sentence and
places the defendant on probation, it may in its discretion, order placed, as a
condition of probation, order the defendant to pay an amount of money to be paid by
the defendant to toward any or all of the following:
(1) To the indigent defender program office of the district public defender
for that court.
* * *
Art. 953. Authority of indigent office of the district public defender board in
emergency sessions of court
The district public defender, or regional director, where applicable, of the
affected court conducting emergency sessions of court outside of its parish or
territorial jurisdiction pursuant to Article 944 shall retain retains the authority for the
appointment of attorneys residing in either the parish or territorial jurisdiction of the
affected court or in the host jurisdiction to represent indigent defendants in the host
jurisdiction that would otherwise have been exercised in the affected court.
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
Section 10. Children's Code Articles 574, 575(A) and (B), 581(A)(introductory
paragraph) and (7), and 608(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 574. Indigent Parents' Representation Program; establishment
An Indigent Parents' Representation Program is hereby established by this
Section within the Louisiana Public Defender Board, office of the state public
defender or its successor in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:185.1 through
185.9 185.8.
Art. 575. Duties of the program; qualifications of counsel
A. The program shall provide qualified legal counsel, which shall include
including curator ad hoc appointments, to indigent or absent parents in child abuse
and neglect cases in accordance with the provisions of Articles 608 and 1016 and
R.S. 15:141 through 183 and 185.1 through 185.9 185.8.
B. Legal representation, which shall include including curator ad hoc
appointments, of indigent or absent parents in child abuse and neglect cases shall
comply with standards promulgated by the Louisiana Public Defender Board, office
of the state public defender or any successor to that board in accordance with R.S.
15:141 through 183 and 185.1 through 185.9 185.8 to ensure competent and fair
representation.
* * *
Art. 581. Child Protection Representation Commission; establishment; purpose and
functions
A. The Child Protection Representation Commission, referred to hereinafter
in this Section as the "commission", is hereby established for the purpose of
reviewing the system of representation of children and indigent parents in child
protection cases as provided in Chapters 5 and 6 of this Title. The commission shall
be composed of the following members:
* * *
(7) The state public defender or his designee of the Louisiana Public
Defender Board.
* * *
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1005 ENROLLED
Art. 608. Parents' right to counsel; payment
* * *
B. If a parent of a child is financially unable to afford counsel or is presumed
indigent in accordance with Paragraph A of this Article, the office of the district
public defender office shall provide for representation, unless the Louisiana Public
Defender Board office of the state public defender has contracted to provide for
representation in accordance with R.S. 15:185.3(B)(12) or any other provision of
law.
* * *
Section 11. R.S. 15:161(H) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.